test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s51_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ganga: # 
    ganga+V+Inf: ganga
    ganga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: gongur
    ganga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: gekk
    ganga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: gingu
    ganga+V+Sup: gingið
